Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $72,888,200.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $578,865
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated  from the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under ORS 406.140 to the  Oregon Criminal Justice Commission, for veterans’ specialty
courts.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$7,259,068 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$5,664,770 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon  Criminal Justice
Commission.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 1
Passed by House May 27, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 8, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5005 (HB 5005-A) Page 2